Illinois, session 104th, SB1402.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Department of Natural Resources Sahara Woods State Recreation 6Area Act. 7    Section 5. Legislative intent. The General Assembly finds 8that authorizing the Department of Natural Resources to enter 9into a public-private partnership for the development, 10construction, maintenance, or operation of campground 11facilities at Sahara Woods State Recreation Area will allow 12greater utilization of the Area and is in the best interest of 13the State and the local community. 14    Section 10. Definitions.15    "Contractor" means a person who has been selected to enter 16or has entered into a public-private agreement with the 17Department on behalf of the State for the development, 18financing, management, or operation of campgrounds facilities 19at Sahara Woods State Recreational Area pursuant to this Act.20    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.21    "Director" means the Director of Natural Resources.22    "Maintain" or "maintenance" includes ordinary maintenance,   SB1402- 2 -LRB104 04619 BDA 14646 b1repair, rehabilitation, capital maintenance, replacement, and 2any other categories of maintenance that may be designated by 3the Department.4    "Offeror" means a person who responds to a request for 5proposals under this Act.6    "Operate" or "operation" means to do one or more of the 7following: maintain, improve, equip, modify, or otherwise 8operate.9    "Person" means any individual, firm, association, joint 10venture, partnership, estate, trust, syndicate, fiduciary, 11corporation, or any other legal entity, group, or combination 12thereof.13    "Public-private agreement" means an agreement or contract 14between the Department and the contractor on behalf of the 15State and all schedules, exhibits, and attachments thereto, 16entered into pursuant to a competitive request for proposals 17process governed by this Act, for the development, 18construction, financing, management and operation of 19campground facilities at Sahara Woods State Recreation Area 20under this Act.21    "Revenues" means all revenues, including, but not limited 22to, income, user fees, earnings, interest, lease payments, 23allocations, moneys from the federal government, the State, 24and units of local government, including, but not limited to, 25federal, State, and local appropriations, grants, loans, lines 26of credit, and credit guarantees; bond proceeds; equity   SB1402- 3 -LRB104 04619 BDA 14646 b1investments; service payments; or other receipts arising out 2of or in connection with the development, construction, 3financing, development, management, or operation of campground 4facilities at Sahara Woods State Recreation Area.5    "Sahara Woods State Recreation Area" means real property 6in Carrier Mills, Illinois, consisting of approximately 4,000 7acres of vacated strip mine land including the 98 acre Sahara 8Lake and numerous strip cuts that make up approximately 270 9acres of fishable water. 10    Section 15. Authority to enter public-private agreement. 11Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the 12Department, on behalf of the State, may enter into a 13public-private agreement to develop, construct, finance, 14lease, manage, and operate campground facilities at Sahara 15Woods State Recreation Area on behalf of the State, pursuant 16to which the contractors may receive certain revenues, 17including management or user fees in consideration of the 18payment of moneys to the State for that right. 19    Section 20. Engagement prior to request for proposals. The 20Director or the Director's designee may, prior to soliciting 21requests for proposals, enter into discussions with interested 22persons in order to assess existing market conditions and 23demands, provided that no such interested persons shall have 24any role in drafting any request for proposals, nor shall any   SB1402- 4 -LRB104 04619 BDA 14646 b1request for proposal be provided to any interested person 2prior to its general public distribution. The Director may 3issue a request for qualifications that requests interested 4persons to provide such information as the Director deems 5necessary in order to evaluate the qualifications of such 6interested persons. This may include, but is not limited to, 7the ability of interested persons to acquire the property, as 8determined by the Director. Such engagement and discussions 9with interested persons are exempt from Sections 50-10.5, 1050-39, 50-40, 50-45, and 50-50 of the Illinois Procurement 11Code. 12    Section 25. Requests for proposals. If requests for 13proposals are made by the Department, the Department shall 14comply with the competitive request for proposals process 15under Article 20 of the Illinois Procurement Code, rules 16adopted under that Code, and this Act. 17    Section 30. Request for proposal process.18    (a) The Department, on behalf of the State, may select a 19contractor through a competitive request for proposals process 20under Article 20 of the Illinois Procurement Code and rules 21adopted under that Article of the Code.22    (b) The competitive request for proposals process shall 23solicit statements of qualification and proposals from 24offerors.  SB1402- 5 -LRB104 04619 BDA 14646 b1    (c) In addition to any requirements under Article 20 of 2the Illinois Procurement Code, the competitive request for 3proposals process may take into account the following 4criteria:5        (1) the offeror's plans for the campgrounds project at 6    Sahara Woods State Recreation Area;7        (2) the offeror's current and past business practices; 8    and9        (3) the offeror's poor or inadequate past performance 10    in developing, financing, constructing, managing, or 11    operating other historic landmark properties or other 12    public assets. 13    Section 35. Provisions of the public-private agreement. 14The public-private agreement shall include all of the 15following:16        (1) the term of the public-private agreement that is 17    consistent with Section 45; 18        (2) the powers, duties, responsibilities, obligations, 19    and functions of the Department and the contractor; 20        (3) compensation or payments to the Department, if 21    applicable; 22        (4) compensation or payments to the contractor, if 23    applicable; 24        (5) a provision specifying that the Department: 25            (A) has ready access to information regarding the   SB1402- 6 -LRB104 04619 BDA 14646 b1        contractor's powers, duties, responsibilities, 2        obligations, and functions under the public-private 3        agreement; 4            (B) has the right to demand and receive 5        information from the contractor concerning any aspect 6        of the contractor's powers, duties, responsibilities, 7        obligations, and functions under the public-private 8        agreement; and 9            (C) has the authority to direct or countermand 10        decisions by the contractor at any time; 11        (6) a provision imposing an affirmative duty on the 12    contractor to provide the Department with any information 13    the contractor reasonably believes the Department would 14    want to know or would need to know to enable the Department 15    to exercise its powers, carry out its duties, 16    responsibilities, and obligations, and perform its 17    functions under this Act or the public-private agreement 18    or as otherwise required by law; 19        (7) the authority of the Department to request that 20    the contractor reimburse the Department for third party 21    consultants related to the monitoring the project; 22        (8) a provision governing the contractor's authority 23    to negotiate and execute subcontracts with third parties; 24        (9) the authority of the contractor to impose user 25    fees and the amounts of those fees; 26        (10) a provision governing the deposit and allocation   SB1402- 7 -LRB104 04619 BDA 14646 b1    of revenues including user fees; 2        (11) a provision governing rights to real and personal 3    property of the State, the Department, the contractor, and 4    other third parties; 5        (12) grounds for termination of the agreement by the 6    Department or the contractor and a restatement of the 7    Department's rights under this Act; 8        (13) a requirement that the contractor enter into a 9    project labor agreement; 10        (14) a provision stating that construction contractors 11    shall comply with the requirements of Section 30-22 of the 12    Illinois Procurement Code; 13        (15) rights and remedies of the Department if the 14    contractor defaults or otherwise fails to comply with the 15    terms of the agreement; 16        (16) procedures for amendment to the agreement; 17        (17) a requirement that the contract complies with the 18    Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons 19    with Disabilities Act and Section 2-105 of the Illinois 20    Human Rights Act; and 21        (18) all other terms, conditions, and provisions 22    acceptable to the Department that the Department deems 23    necessary and proper and in the public interest. 24    Section 40. Labor.25    (a) A public-private agreement related to Sahara Woods   SB1402- 8 -LRB104 04619 BDA 14646 b1State Recreation Area pertaining to the building, altering, 2repairing, maintaining, improving, or demolishing of 3campground facilities shall require the contractor and all 4subcontractors to comply with the requirements of Section 530-22 of the Illinois Procurement Code as they apply to 6responsible bidders, including, but not limited to, all 7applicable provisions of the Prevailing Wage Act, and to 8present satisfactory evidence of that compliance to the 9Department, unless the project is federally funded and the 10application of those requirements would jeopardize the receipt 11or use of federal funds in support of the project.12    (b) A public-private agreement related to Sahara Woods 13State Recreation Area pertaining to the building, altering, 14repairing, maintaining, improving, or demolishing campground 15facilities at the Area shall require the contractor and all 16subcontractors to enter into a project labor agreement used by 17the Capital Development Board. 18    Section 45. Term of agreement; reversion of property to 19the Department.20    (a) The term of any public-private agreement entered into 21under this Act shall be no less than 25 years and no more than 2299 years.23    (b) The Department may terminate the contractor's 24authority and duties under the public-private agreement on the 25date set forth in the public-private agreement. The Department   SB1402- 9 -LRB104 04619 BDA 14646 b1may also terminate the public-private agreement pursuant to 2any clause or condition as set forth in the public-private 3agreement.4    (c) Upon termination of the public-private agreement, the 5authority, and duties of the contractor under this Act cease, 6except for those duties and obligations that extend beyond the 7termination, as set forth in the public-private agreement, and 8all interests in the campground facilities at Sahara Woods 9State Recreation Area shall revert to the Department. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.